Utah statutes.
76-10-505.   Carrying loaded firearm in vehicle or on street.

(1)  Unless otherwise authorized by law, a person may not carry a loaded firearm:

(a)  in or on a vehicle, unless:

(i)  the vehicle is in the person's lawful possession; or

(ii)  the person is carrying the loaded firearm in a vehicle with the consent of the person lawfully in possession of the vehicle;

(b)  on a public street; or

(c)  in a posted prohibited area.

(2)  Subsection (1)(a) does not apply to a minor under 18 years of age, since a minor under 18 years of age may not carry a loaded firearm in or on a vehicle.

(3)  Notwithstanding Subsection (1)(a)(i) and (ii), a person may not possess a loaded rifle, shotgun, or muzzle-loading rifle in a vehicle.

(4)  A violation of this section is a class B misdemeanor.



Amended by Chapter 362, 2009 General Session

